Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1958.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7102 heading, (a), (a.1), (a.2) and (c.2) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 7102. [Comparative negligence] Fair share of liability.(a) General rule.--In all actions brought to recover damages for negligence resulting in death or injury to person or property, the fact that the plaintiff may have been [guilty of contributory negligence] contributorily negligent shall not bar a recovery by the plaintiff or [his] the plaintiff's legal representative where such negligence was not greater than the causal negligence of the defendant or defendants against whom recovery is sought, but any damages sustained by the plaintiff shall be diminished in proportion to the amount of negligence 12345678910111213141516171819 attributed to the plaintiff.(a.1) Recovery against joint defendant; contribution.--(1) [Where recovery is allowed against more than one person] In an action to recover damages for death or injury to a person or property, including [actions] an action for strict liability[, and where liability is attributed to more than one defendant,] and an action in which the plaintiff has not been found contributorily negligent, each defendant shall be liable for that proportion of the total dollar amount awarded as damages in the ratio of the amount of that defendant's liability to the amount of liability attributed to all defendants and other persons to whom liability is apportioned under subsection (a.2). Liability in a tort action, including an action for strict liability, shall be apportioned on a percentage basis.(2) Except as set forth in paragraph (3), a defendant's liability shall be several and not joint, and the court shall enter a separate and several judgment in favor of the plaintiff and against each defendant against whom strict liability or negligence is assessed for the apportioned amount of that defendant's liability.(2.1) In an exposure-related tort case involving two or more persons that combine to cause an indivisible injury, including an asbestos case, the trier of fact shall apportion liability based on the relative contribution of each person to the plaintiff's dose of exposure, as assessed by a jury based upon admissible fact and expert testimony.(3) A defendant's liability in any of the following actions shall be joint and several, and the court shall enter a joint and several judgment in favor of the plaintiff and 20250HB1958PN2474 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 against the defendant for the total dollar amount awarded as damages:(i) Intentional misrepresentation.(ii) An intentional tort.(iii) Where the defendant has been held liable for not less than 60% of the total liability apportioned to all parties.(iv) A release or threatened release of a hazardous substance under section 702 of the act of October 18, 1988 (P.L.756, No.108), known as the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Act.(v) A civil action in which a defendant has violated section 497 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code.(4) Where a defendant has been held jointly and severally liable under this subsection and discharges by payment more than that defendant's proportionate share of the total liability, that defendant is entitled to recover contribution from [defendants who] liable persons that have paid less than their proportionate share. Further, in any case, any defendant may recover from any other person all or a portion of the damages assessed that defendant pursuant to the terms of a contractual agreement.(a.2) Apportionment of responsibility among certain nonparties and effect.--For purposes of apportioning liability only, the [question of] liability of any defendant or other person [who has entered into a release with the plaintiff with respect to the action and who] that is not a party shall be transmitted to the trier of fact upon appropriate requests and proofs by any party. A person whose liability may be determined 20250HB1958PN2474 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pursuant to this section does not include an employer to the extent that the employer is granted immunity from liability or suit pursuant to the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act. An attribution of responsibility to any person or entity as provided in this subsection shall not be admissible or relied upon in any other action or proceeding for any purpose. Nothing in this section shall affect the admissibility or nonadmissibility of evidence regarding releases, settlements, offers to compromise or compromises as set forth in the Pennsylvania Rules of Evidence. Nothing in this section shall affect the rules of joinder of parties as set forth in the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure.* * *(c.2) Savings provisions.--Nothing in this section shall be construed in any way to create, abolish or modify a cause of action or to limit a party's right to join another potentially responsible party[.], except that this section abrogates the common law governing apportionment of liability among joint tortfeasors in strict liability actions.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to all causes of action that accrue after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1958PN2474 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324